Mississippi, session 2026, HB891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, "pay period" means the period that an employee works for which salary or wages are regularly paid under the employee's employment agreement. (2)  A current or former employee may make a written request to his or her employer for a written earnings statement covering the employee's pay period for the period requested.  The employee's written request must be sent by Certified Mail with Return Receipt Requested, hand delivered with signed receipt, or sent by email to the employer or the employer's agent. (3)  The employer shall provide the written earnings statement to the employee no later than twenty-one (21) days after receiving the written request from the employee. (4)  The written earnings statement must be signed by the employer or the employer's agent and must include: (a)  The name of the employee; (b)  The rate of pay; (c)  The total amount of pay earned by the employee during the pay period; (d)  Any deduction made from the employee's pay and the purpose of the deduction; (e)  The amount of pay after all deductions are made; and (f)  The total number of: (i)  Hours worked by the employee if the employee's pay is computed by the hour; or (ii)  Units produced by the employee during the pay period if the employee's pay is computed on a piece rate. (5)  An earnings statement may be provided in any written form determined by the employer.  The information required by subsection (4) of this section may be stated on a check voucher or bank draft given to an employee for the employee's wages. (6)  (a)  The Office of the Attorney General shall post on its official website information regarding an employee's right to request a written earnings statement as provided in this section and information regarding an employee's right to file a complaint against an employer who violates this section. (b)  An employee must make the complaint in the format prescribed by the Office of the Attorney General and must include any information required by the Office of the Attorney General.  The Office of the Attorney General shall provide a link on its official website for an employee to file a complaint electronically, a telephone number for an employee to file a complaint via telephone, and a mailing address for an employee to file a complaint via mail. (c)  The Attorney General shall investigate the filed complaints, and if an employer is found to be in violation of this section, the Attorney General shall fine the employer Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) for each violation. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.